Utah statutes.
17D-1-304.   Qualifications of administrative control board members -- Term
of office.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), each member of an
administrative control board shall be:
(i)  a registered voter within the special service district; or
(ii)  an officer or employee of the county or municipality that created the
special service district.
(b)  Subsection (1)(a) does not apply if:
(i)  at least 90% of the owners of real property within the special service
district are not registered voters within the special service district; or
(ii)  the member is appointed under Subsection 17D-1-303(2)(b)(i) or (ii).
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the term of each member of
an administrative control board is four years.
(b)  The term of as close as possible to half of the initial members of an
administrative control board, chosen by lot, is two years.
